src/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON adjectives
амасалык:амасалык A_КОЛ  "ovea varten oleva" ;
ана:ана A_ОЛМА  "verso=" ;
анзылишӹ:анзылишӹ A_ТӸРВӸ  "parin vuoden vanha" ;
арик-сурик:арик-сурик A_МӦР  "hölmö" ;
армараждымы:армараждымы A_МАРЫ  "etuhalkioton" ;
аттестатан:аттестатан A_КОЛ  "" ;
билетдӹмӹ:билетдӹмӹ A_ТӸРВӸ  "matkaliputon" ;
ботан:ботан A_КОЛ  "" ;
будкыштышы:будкыштышы A_МАРЫ  "" ;
ватан:ватан A_КОЛ  "" ;
вентиляциӓн:вентиляциӓн A_МӦР  "ilmanvaihtoinen" ;
винӓдӹмӹ:винӓдӹмӹ A_ТӸРВӸ  "syytön" ;
виӓкӓ:виӓкӓ A_ӒЗӒ  "suora" ;
виӓш:виӓш A_  "suora" ;
вурдыдымы:вурдыдымы A_МАРЫ  "varreton" ;
выжга:выжга A_ОЛМА  "kuohkea" ;
вычитаемый:вычитаемый A_КОЛ  "vähennettävä" ;
вӹдсӹнзӓӓн:вӹдсӹнзӓӓн A_МӦР  "kaivo=" ;
вӹртӹмӹ:вӹртӹмӹ A_ТӸРВӸ  "" ;
вӹциӓш:вӹциӓш A_  "viisivuotias" ;
грамотный:грамотный A_КОЛ  "pätevä" ;
гримӓн:гримӓн A_МӦР  "meikattu" ;
гудокдымы:гудокдымы A_МАРЫ  "torviton" ;
документдӹмӹ:документдӹмӹ A_ТӸРВӸ  "" ;
дробян:дробян A_КОЛ  "jako=" ;
жепӓн:жепӓн A_МӦР  "ikuinen" ;
жепӓш:жепӓш A_  "sopiva" ;
замокдымы:замокдымы A_МАРЫ  "linnaton" ;
зенитный:зенитный A_КОЛ  "" ;
идейдӹмӹ:идейдӹмӹ A_ТӸРВӸ  "aatteeton" ;
икпоратка:икпоратка A_ОЛМА  "keskinkertainen" ;
иктӧр:иктӧр A_  "tasainen" ;
имниӓн:имниӓн A_МӦР  "hevosia omistava" ;
интервалдымы:интервалдымы A_МАРЫ  "intervalliton" ;
инфантильный:инфантильный A_КОЛ  "lapsellinen" ;
ирӹкдӹмӹ:ирӹкдӹмӹ A_ТӸРВӸ  "rauhaton" ;
июняш:июняш A_  "kesäkuinen" ;
йолтишкӓ:йолтишкӓ A_ӒЗӒ  "huoleton" ;
йорга:йорга A_ОЛМА  "tasainen" ;
йыкырикӓ:йыкырака A_  "apea" ;
йӓктӓн:йӓктӓн A_МӦР  "mäntyinen" ;
йӓнӓтпи:йӓнӓтпи A_ӒЗӒ  "pyörivä" ;
йӹвӹжӓ:йӹвӹжӓ A_ӒЗӒ  "hellä" ;
йӹнгӹлдӹмӹ:йӹнгӹлдӹмӹ A_ТӸРВӸ  "kelloton" ;
йӹпш:йӹпш A_  "liero" ;
кагыла:кагыла A_ОЛМА  "kimmoisa" ;
кадыри:кадыри A_ӒЗӒ  "riitainen" ;
казначействан:казначействан A_КОЛ  "valtionrahasto=" ;
казначействыдымы:казначействыдымы A_МАРЫ  "rahastoton" ;
каклака:каклака A_ОЛМА  "kankea" ;
какша:какша A_ОЛМА  "kalju" ;
кальциӓн:кальциӓн A_МӦР  "kalsiumia sisältävä" ;
канга:канга A_ОЛМА  "laiha" ;
капиллярдымы:капиллярдымы A_МАРЫ  "" ;
капкаан:капкаан A_КОЛ  "veräjäinen" ;
кар:кар A_  "kierä" ;
каталогдымы:каталогдымы A_МАРЫ  "katalogiton" ;
катерӹштӹшӹ:катерӹштӹшӹ A_ТӸРВӸ  "moottoriveneessä oleva" ;
катокан:катокан A_КОЛ  "luistinradalla varustettu" ;
кердӓн:кердӓн A_МӦР  "sapelilla varustettu" ;
кладовой:кладовой A_  "" ;
клумбыдымы:клумбыдымы A_МАРЫ  "kukkalavaton" ;
книгӓдӹмӹ:книгӓдӹмӹ A_ТӸРВӸ  "kirjaton" ;
ковёран:ковёран A_КОЛ  "matto=" ;
колой:колой A_  "kelvoton" ;
комдышдымы:комдышдымы A_МАРЫ  "kanneton" ;
комитетӓн:комитетӓн A_МӦР  "komitea=" ;
конан:конан A_КОЛ  "emäksinen" ;
конференциштӹшӹ:конференциштӹшӹ A_ТӸРВӸ  "konferenssissä oleva" ;
корнан:корнан A-ADN_  "raidallinen" ;
корцакдымы:корцакдымы A_МАРЫ  "saviastiaton" ;
косинусный:косинусный A_КОЛ  "kosini=" ;
кофеӓн:кофеӓн A_МӦР  "kahvinen" ;
крӓгӓ:крӓгӓ A_ӒЗӒ  "oikukas" ;
куашнаштышы:куашнаштышы A_МАРЫ  "alustetussa taikinassa oleva" ;
кувшиндӹмӹ:кувшиндӹмӹ A_ТӸРВӸ  "kannuton" ;
куктынзыкан:куктынзыкан A_КОЛ  "sekaannus=" ;
кукула:кукула A_ОЛМА  "kirjo" ;
курьяш:курьяш A_  "yrjänänpäivän" ;
кыдышыштышы:кыдышыштышы A_МАРЫ  "aitausvälissä oleva" ;
кыйыраан:кыйыраан A_КОЛ  "puulastuinen" ;
кылдыри:кылдыри A_ӒЗӒ  "" ;
кымдемӓн:кымдемӓн A_МӦР  "alue=" ;
кӓзӓварняштышы:кӓзӓварняштышы A_МАРЫ  "pikkusormessa oleva" ;
кӓкӓ:кӓкӓ A_  "sinertyvä" ;
кӓкӓргӹ:кӓкӓргӹ A_ТӸРВӸ  "sinertyvä" ;
кӓргӓ:кӓргӓ A_ӒЗӒ  "kupera" ;
кӧштӹрӓн:кӧштӹрӓн A_МӦР  "hanki=" ;
кӱкрикӓ:кӱкрикӓ A_ӒЗӒ  "kumpuinen" ;
кӱшӹл:кӱшӹл A_  "ylä=" ;
кӱэрӹштӹшӹ:кӱэрӹштӹшӹ A_ТӸРВӸ  "kivistöllä oleva" ;
кӹткӓ:кӹткӓ A_ӒЗӒ  "hidaskulkuinen" ;
кӹтӹк:кӹтӹк A_  "lyhyt" ;
кӹцкӹшӓн:кӹцкӹшӓн A_МӦР  "valjais=" ;
кӹшкӓрдӹмӹ:кӹшкӓрдӹмӹ A_ТӸРВӸ  "rungoton" ;
ладакан:ладакан A_КОЛ  "kotelolla varustettu" ;
ладыра:ладыра A_ОЛМА  "" ;
лапката:лапката A_ОЛМА  "matalahko" ;
лапшака:лапшака A_ОЛМА  "heikko" ;
лесничествыштышы:лесничествыштышы A_МАРЫ  "metsänvartijastossa oleva" ;
линейкӓн:линейкӓн A_МӦР  "viivoittimella varustettu" ;
ложна:ложна A_ОЛМА  "" ;
лоиш:лоиш A_  "keskivertolaatuinen" ;
лызга:лызга A_ОЛМА  "" ;
лынзыри:лынзыри A_ӒЗӒ  "repaleinen" ;
льыржа:льыржа A_ОЛМА  "" ;
лявӹрӓдӹмӹ:лявӹрӓдӹмӹ A_ТӸРВӸ  "kuraton" ;
ляпцӓкӓ:ляпцӓкӓ A_ӒЗӒ  "litistynyt" ;
лӧптӹрӓ:лӧптӹрӓ A_ӒЗӒ  "" ;
лӱдӹшлӓ:лӱдӹшлӓ A_ӒЗӒ  "pelottava" ;
лӹпӓн:лӹпӓн A_МӦР  "perhos=" ;
мандатан:мандатан A_КОЛ  "mandaatti=" ;
маршрутдымы:маршрутдымы A_МАРЫ  "matkareititön" ;
махань-гӹнят:махань-гӹнят A_  "jonkinlainen" ;
мекӓ:мекӓ A_ӒЗӒ  "mykkä" ;
мимикӓн:мимикӓн A_МӦР  "" ;
музейдӹмӹ:музейдӹмӹ A_ТӸРВӸ  "" ;
мыньыри:мыньыри A_ӒЗӒ  "" ;
мыржа:мыржа A_ОЛМА  "epämuodostunut" ;
мытык:мытык A_КОЛ  "lyhyt" ;
мӧть-мӧть:мӧть-мӧть A_  "" ;
наличникӓн:наличникӓн A_МӦР  "" ;
намозыдымы:намозыдымы A_МАРЫ  "" ;
ненец:ненец A_  "nenetsiläinen" ;
ньыктыри:ньыктыри A_ӒЗӒ  "" ;
ньыстыри:ньыстыри A_ӒЗӒ  "" ;
няцката:няцката A_ОЛМА  "" ;
нӓрӓштӓ:нӓрӓштӓ A_ӒЗӒ  "" ;
нӹшкӹ:нӹшкӹ A_ТӸРВӸ  "" ;
обедняӓн:обедняӓн A_МӦР  "" ;
овыдымы:овыдымы A_МАРЫ  "" ;
окнялык:окнялык A_КОЛ  "" ;
орати:орати A_ӒЗӒ  "" ;
охраныдымы:охраныдымы A_МАРЫ  "" ;
ошикӓ-кловой:ошикӓ-кловой A_  "" ;
ошикӓ-симсӹ:ошикӓ-симсӹ A_ТӸРВӸ  "" ;
ошкерӓн:ошкерӓн A_МӦР  "" ;
падыра:падыра A_ОЛМА  "" ;
панноан:панноан A_КОЛ  "" ;
папкыдымы:папкыдымы A_МАРЫ  "" ;
пасна:пасна A_ОЛМА  "erillinen" ;
пешняӓн:пешняӓн A_МӦР  "" ;
плацкартыдымы:плацкартыдымы A_МАРЫ  "" ;
плашан:плашан A_КОЛ  "" ;
пленӹштӹшӹ:пленӹштӹшӹ A_ТӸРВӸ  "" ;
покшал:покшал A_  "" ;
полицӓӓн:полицӓӓн A_МӦР  "" ;
потолыкдымы:потолыкдымы A_МАРЫ  "" ;
предложенидӹмӹ:предложенидӹмӹ A_ТӸРВӸ  "" ;
примечаниӓн:примечаниӓн A_МӦР  "" ;
прогалан:прогалан A_КОЛ  "" ;
пуста:пуста A_ОЛМА  "" ;
пухар:пухар A_  "" ;
пушкадымы:пушкадымы A_МАРЫ  "" ;
пыйыри:пыйыри A_ӒЗӒ  "" ;
пырга:пырга A_ОЛМА  "hedelmällinen" ;
пыси:пыси A_ӒЗӒ  "" ;
пьесӓн:пьесӓн A_МӦР  "" ;
пӓлӹ:пӓлӹ A_ТӸРВӸ  "" ;
пӹльдӹви:пӹльдӹви A_ӒЗӒ  "" ;
пӹцкӓтӓ:пӹцкӓтӓ A_ӒЗӒ  "tummansävyinen" ;
радиацидӹмӹ:радиацидӹмӹ A_ТӸРВӸ  "" ;
рейкӓн:рейкӓн A_МӦР  "" ;
рестораныштышы:рестораныштышы A_МАРЫ  "" ;
ресурсан:ресурсан A_КОЛ  "" ;
рӹжлӹ:рӹжлӹ A_ТӸРВӸ  "" ;
саралгы-ыжар:саралгы-ыжар A_  "" ;
саралгы-ыжаргы:саралгы-ыжаргы A_МАРЫ  "" ;
сарикӓ:сарикӓ A_ӒЗӒ  "" ;
сирӹп:сирӹп A_  "" ;
ситӓлык:ситӓлык A_КОЛ  "riittävä" ;
смела:смела A_ОЛМА  "" ;
специӓн:специӓн A_МӦР  "" ;
станциштӹшӹ:станциштӹшӹ A_ТӸРВӸ  "" ;
судныштышы:судныштышы A_МАРЫ  "" ;
сыцан:сыцан A_КОЛ  "" ;
сӓмӹрӹк:сӓмӹрӹк A_  "" ;
тангыла:тангыла A_ОЛМА  "" ;
тарыдымы:тарыдымы A_МАРЫ  "" ;
телӓш:телӓш A_  "" ;
темпдӹмӹ:темпдӹмӹ A_ТӸРВӸ  "" ;
течениӓн:течениӓн A_МӦР  "" ;
тошна:тошна A_ОЛМА  "" ;
трамваян:трамваян A_КОЛ  "" ;
трансформатордымы:трансформатордымы A_МАРЫ  "" ;
туат:туат A_  "" ;
тыргата:тыргата A_ОЛМА  "" ;
тыркыше:тыркыше A_  "" ;
тыртишкӓ:тыртишкӓ A_ӒЗӒ  "" ;
тӓгӓнӓдӹмӹ:тӓгӓнӓдӹмӹ A_ТӸРВӸ  "" ;
тӧпкӓтӓ:тӧпкӓтӓ A_ӒЗӒ  "" ;
тӱж:тӱж A_  "" ;
тӹрӹс:тӹрӹс A_  "" ;
уадымы:уадымы A_МАРЫ  "pajuton" ;
услуган:услуган A_КОЛ  "" ;
утикӓӓн:утикӓӓн A_МӦР  "" ;
фабрикӹдӹмӹ:фабрикӹдӹмӹ A_ТӸРВӸ  "" ;
фуфайкыдымы:фуфайкыдымы A_МАРЫ  "" ;
хана:хана A_ОЛМА  "" ;
хир:хир A_  "villi" ;
цажгата:цажгата A_ОЛМА  "" ;
цартака:цартака A_ОЛМА  "valpas" ;
цингаан:цингаан A_КОЛ  "" ;
цыгыла:цыгыла A_ОЛМА  "" ;
цӓцӓ:цӓцӓ A_ӒЗӒ  "kaunis" ;
цӹреӓн:цӹреӓн A_МӦР  "" ;
частицӹдӹмӹ:частицӹдӹмӹ A_ТӸРВӸ  "" ;
чыката:чыката A_ОЛМА  "" ;
чыникӓ:чыникӓ A_ӒЗӒ  "" ;
шандалдымы:шандалдымы A_МАРЫ  "" ;
шапка:шапка A_ОЛМА  "" ;
шергӓш:шергӓш A_  "" ;
шимӓкӓ:шимӓкӓ A_ӒЗӒ  "tummahko" ;
ширӹдӹмӹ:ширӹдӹмӹ A_ТӸРВӸ  "" ;
шпаган:шпаган A_КОЛ  "" ;
шӓнгӓн:шӓнгӓн A_МӦР  "" ;
шӓрлӓкӓ:шӓрлӓкӓ A_ӒЗӒ  "" ;
шӹмӓ:шӹмӓ A_ӒЗӒ  "" ;
шӹркӓмӓдӹмӹ:шӹркӓмӓдӹмӹ A_ТӸРВӸ  "" ;
ыжар:ыжар A_  "vihreä" ;
ыныкадымы:ыныкадымы A_МАРЫ  "" ;
эпиграмман:эпиграмман A_КОЛ  "" ;
юл:юл A_  "" ;
яклака:яклака A_ОЛМА  "" ;
якшаралгы-кӹрӓн:якшаралгы-кӹрӓн A_МӦР  "punertavan ruskea" ;
якшарикӓ:якшарикӓ A_ӒЗӒ  "punaisensävyinen" ;
ячака:ячака A_ОЛМА  "" ;
ӓнӓш:ӓнӓш A_  "riihiaines=" ;
ӓпшӓтдӹмӹ:ӓпшӓтдӹмӹ A_ТӸРВӸ  "sepätön" ;
ӹлцӹкдӹмӹ:ӹлцӹкдӹмӹ A_ТӸРВӸ  "vihneetön" ;
ӹрӓнӓн:ӹрӓнӓн A_МӦР  "piparjuuri=" ;
